Nevada, session 83, SB152.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 116 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Notwithstanding any provision in the governing documents
to the contrary:
(a) An association may install an electric vehicle charging
station in a common area if:
-
*SB152_R1*

– 2 –
(1) The location in the common area is not being used for
recreation, including, without limitation, being used as a park,
playground or open play space;
(2) A majority of the units’ owners, whether present in
person or by proxy, do not reject the proposed electric vehicle
charging station by vote at a regular meeting of the executive
board where the installation of the proposed electric vehicle
charging station is an agenda item listed for discussion;
(3) The association complies with the provisions of
subsection 3 of NRS 116.345; and
(4) Placement of the electric vehicle charging station in
that location does not increase any cost to any unit owner or
violate any applicable zoning ordinance, permit or approval.
(b) An association may, after complying with the provisions of
subparagraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of paragraph (a), enter into
any necessary contract with any person for the installation or
maintenance of an electric vehicle charging station in a common
area.
(c) The installation and maintenance of an electric vehicle
charging station in a common area shall be deemed not to
constitute:
(1) A change in use of the common area;
(2) A commercial use of the common area; or
(3) A capital improvement.
2. As used in this section, “electric vehicle charging station”
means a station that delivers electricity from a source outside an
electric vehicle into one or more electric vehicles. The term
includes, without limitation, an electric vehicle charging
station where several charge points simultaneously connect
several electric vehicles to the station and any related
equipment needed to facilitate charging electric vehicles.
H
-
*SB152_R1*